test/src/morphology/adj-noattr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup

# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

#Adjektives with no attribute. Adjectives from lexicon IENNILS, SUOLASIEHKE, SÁVADAHTTE, SJÆVNNJAT

Tests:
  Adjective - ieŋŋils: # IENNILS
    ieŋŋils+A+Attr: báhkka
    ieŋŋils+A+Sg+Nom: báhkas
    ieŋŋils+A+Sg+Acc: báhkkasav
    ieŋŋils+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: báhkkasabbo
    ieŋŋils+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: báhkkasamos

  Adjective - sárnnediddjesiehke: # SUOLASIEHKE
    sárnnediddjesiehke+A+Attr: sájsse
    sárnnediddjesiehke+A+Sg+Nom: sájsas
    sárnnediddjesiehke+A+Sg+Ine: sájssasin
    sárnnediddjesiehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sájssasabbo
    sárnnediddjesiehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sájssasamos

  Adjective - dádjadahtte: # SÁVADAHTTE
    dádjadahtte+A+Attr: tjáppa
    dádjadahtte+A+Sg+Nom: tjábbe
    dádjadahtte+A+Sg+Com: tjáppajn
    dádjadahtte+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjáppep
    dádjadahtte+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:tjáppemus
    
      Adjective - smávuk: # SJÆVNNJAT
    smávuk+A+Attr: []
    smávuk+A+Sg+Nom: smávuk 
    smávuk+A+Sg+Gen: smávuga 
    smávuk+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: smávugabbo
    smávuk+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: smávugamos
